Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.060

Exceptions to restrictions on carrying firearms.

The provisions of RCW 9.41.050 shall not apply to:

(1)(a) Marshals, sheriffs, prison or jail wardens or their deputies, correctional personnel and community corrections officers as long as they are employed as such who have completed government-sponsored law enforcement firearms training and have been subject to a background check within the past five years, or other law enforcement officers of this state or another state.

(b) Nothing in this subsection permits possession of a firearm by a deferred action for childhood arrivals recipient lawfully employed as a peace officer as defined in RCW 10.120.010 or a corrections officer as defined in RCW 43.101.010 beyond the authority granted under RCW 10.93.200;

(2) Members of the armed forces of the United States or of the national guard or organized reserves, when on duty;

(3) Officers or employees of the United States duly authorized to carry a concealed pistol;

(4) Any person engaged in the business of manufacturing, repairing, or dealing in firearms, or the agent or representative of the person, if possessing, using, or carrying a pistol in the usual or ordinary course of the business;

(5) Regularly enrolled members of any organization duly authorized to purchase or receive pistols from the United States or from this state;

(6) Regularly enrolled members of clubs organized for the purpose of target shooting, when those members are at or are going to or from their places of target practice;

(7) Regularly enrolled members of clubs organized for the purpose of modern and antique firearm collecting, when those members are at or are going to or from their collector's gun shows and exhibits;

(8) Any person engaging in a lawful outdoor recreational activity such as hunting, fishing, camping, hiking, or horseback riding, only if, considering all of the attendant circumstances, including but not limited to whether the person has a valid hunting or fishing license, it is reasonable to conclude that the person is participating in lawful outdoor activities or is traveling to or from a legitimate outdoor recreation area;

(9) Any person while carrying a pistol unloaded and in a closed opaque case or secure wrapper; or

(10) Law enforcement officers retired for service or physical disabilities, except for those law enforcement officers retired because of mental or stress-related disabilities. This subsection applies only to a retired officer who has: (a) Obtained documentation from a law enforcement agency within Washington state from which he or she retired that is signed by the agency's chief law enforcement officer and that states that the retired officer was retired for service or physical disability; and (b) not been convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity of a crime making him or her ineligible for a concealed pistol license.

[ 2024 c 330 s 3; 2019 c 231 s 1; 2011 c 221 s 1; 2005 c 453 s 3; 1998 c 253 s 2; 1996 c 295 s 5; 1995 c 392 s 1; 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 406; 1961 c 124 s 5; 1935 c 172 s 6; RRS s 2516-6.]

NOTES:

Severability—2005 c 453: See note following RCW 9.41.040.

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.

Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 7 ss 401-410, 413-416, 418-437, and 439-460: See note following RCW 9.41.010.